Tennessee statutes. Title 31 Descent And Distribution
Chapter 3

Uniform Simultaneous Death Act

31-3-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Simultaneous Death Act.”

Acts 1941, ch. 59, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.1 (Williams, § 8407.8); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 31-501.

Cross-References. Uniform determination of death act, title 68, ch. 3, part 5.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 448, 913, 1001.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 4-603, 4-604.

Collateral References.

Construction, application, and effect of Uniform Simultaneous Death Act. 39 A.L.R.3d 1332.

31-3-102. Disposition of property where there is no sufficient evidence of survivorship.

Where the title to property or the devolution thereof depends upon priority of death and there is no sufficient evidence that the persons have died otherwise than simultaneously, the property of each person shall be disposed of as if the person had survived, except as provided otherwise in this chapter.

Acts 1941, ch. 59, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.2 (Williams, § 8407.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 31-502.

Compiler's Notes. The reference to “this chapter” now includes § 31-3-120, added by Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 16.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 914.

Law Reviews.

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Use of Survivorship Clauses in Wills, 8 Vand. L. Rev. 627 (1955).

31-3-103. Beneficiaries of another person's disposition of property.

Where two (2) or more beneficiaries are designated to take successively (by reason of survivorship) under another person's disposition of property and there is no sufficient evidence that these beneficiaries have died otherwise than simultaneously, the property thus disposed of shall be divided into as many equal portions as there are successive beneficiaries, and these portions shall be distributed respectively to those who would have taken in the event that each designated beneficiary had survived.

Acts 1941, ch. 59, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.3 (Williams, § 8407.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 31-503.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 915.

Law Reviews.

Use of Survivorship Clauses in Wills, 8 Vand. L. Rev. 627 (1955).

Collateral References.

Wills: construction of provision as to which of two or more parties shall be deemed the survivor in case of death simultaneously, in a common disaster, or within a specified period of time. 40 A.L.R.3d 359.

31-3-104. Joint tenants or tenants by the entirety.

Where there is no sufficient evidence that two (2) joint tenants or tenants by the entirety have died otherwise than simultaneously, the property so held shall be distributed one-half (½) as if one had survived and one-half (½) as if the other had survived. If there are more than two (2) joint tenants and all of them have so died, the property thus distributed shall be in the proportion that one bears to the whole number of joint tenants.

Acts 1941, ch. 59, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.4 (Williams, § 8407.3); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 31-504.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 440, 916.

Law Reviews.

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Use of Survivorship Clauses in Wills, 8 Vand. L. Rev. 627 (1955).

31-3-105. Disposition of insurance proceeds.

Where the insured and the beneficiary in a policy of life or accident insurance have died and there is no sufficient evidence that they have died otherwise than simultaneously, the proceeds of the policy shall be distributed as if the insured had survived the beneficiary.

Acts 1941, ch. 59, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.5 (Williams, § 8407.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 31-505.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 917.

31-3-106. Application of chapter.

This chapter shall not apply in the case of wills, living trusts, deeds, or contracts of insurance wherein provision has been made for the distribution of property different from the provisions of this chapter.

Acts 1941, ch. 59, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.7 (Williams, § 8407.6); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 31-507.

31-3-107. Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be so construed and interpreted as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law in those states which enact it.

Acts 1941, ch. 59, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 8407.8 (Williams, § 8407.7); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 31-508.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 918, 1001.

31-3-108 — 31-3-119.
[Reserved.]

An individual who fails to survive the decedent by one hundred twenty (120) hours is deemed to have predeceased the decedent for purposes of the homestead allowance, year's support allowance, exempt property, elective share and intestate succession, and the decedent's heirs are determined accordingly.

A devisee who fails to survive the testator by one hundred twenty (120) hours is deemed to have predeceased the testator, unless the will of the decedent contains language dealing explicitly with simultaneous deaths or deaths in a common disaster or requiring that the devisee survive by a stated period of time in order to take under the will.

If it is not established by clear and convincing evidence that an individual who would otherwise be an heir or devisee survived the decedent by one hundred twenty (120) hours, it is deemed that such individual failed to survive for the required period. This section is not to be applied if its application would result in property of any nature escheating to the state.

Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provides that this section shall apply to estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

31-3-120. Individual failing to survive decedent by one hundred twenty (120) hours.